public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A r rision/M [aku]rifegar
SFX A r rision/M [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A r rision/M [als]tar
SFX A r rision/M [an]deđar
SFX A r rision/M [an]fraxar
SFX A r rision/M [an]kuerar
SFX A r rision/M [an]kuirar
SFX A r rision/M [ano]fegar
SFX A r rision/M [anou]pir
SFX A r rision/M [ao]er
SFX A r rision/M [ao]ir
SFX A r rision/M [ao]niđar
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rcar
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rdar
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rdir
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rdonar
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rkar
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rnar
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rnir
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rsar
SFX A r rision/M [ao]rtir
SFX A r rision/M [aou]nŧiar
SFX A r rision/M [aou]rbar
SFX A r rision/M [aou]rbir
SFX A r rision/M [aou]rgar
SFX A r rision/M [aou]rkiar
SFX A r rision/M [aou]rlar
SFX A r rision/M [aou]rtar
SFX A r rision/M [aou]rŧar
SFX A r rision/M [ar]naliđar
SFX A r rision/M [aux]nar
SFX A r rision/M [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A r rision/M [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A r rision/M [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A r rision/M [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A r rision/M [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A r rision/M [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A r rision/M [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A r rision/M [bdfjmnptvx]iar
SFX A r rision/M [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A r rision/M [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A r rision/M [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A r rision/M [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A r rision/M [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A r rision/M [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A r rision/M [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A r rision/M [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A r rision/M [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A r rision/M [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A r rision/M [bln]uir
SFX A r rision/M [blprsvx]ear
SFX A r rision/M [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A r rision/M [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A r rision/M [bou]rogar
SFX A r rision/M [bp]erlar
SFX A r rision/M [btv]ergar
SFX A r rision/M [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A r rision/M [cfgjlmsxđ]ir
SFX A r rision/M [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A r rision/M [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A r rision/M [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A r rision/M [dg]obar
SFX A r rision/M [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A r rision/M [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A r rision/M [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A r rision/M [dltv]ernar
SFX A r rision/M [ds]oler
SFX A r rision/M [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A r rision/M [eilox]mar
SFX A r rision/M [einoru]xar
SFX A r rision/M [einosu]car
SFX A r rision/M [eiu]xurar
SFX A r rision/M [eo]liđar
SFX A r rision/M [eo]ntiđar
SFX A r rision/M [es]kotar
SFX A r rision/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A r rision/M [fjkx]ermar
SFX A r rision/M [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A r rision/M [fm]eretar
SFX A r rision/M [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A r rision/M [fsx]ierir
SFX A r rision/M [ft]erdir
SFX A r rision/M [fŧ]etuar
SFX A r rision/M [gin]ritar
SFX A r rision/M [iln]trar
SFX A r rision/M [inru]jar
SFX A r rision/M [io]ntar
SFX A r rision/M [io]rkolar
SFX A r rision/M [ipt]ađar
SFX A r rision/M [ipu]lar
SFX A r rision/M [irst]umar
SFX A r rision/M [klt]ivar
SFX A r rision/M [kp]avejar
SFX A r rision/M [kt]erŧar
SFX A r rision/M [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A r rision/M [ln]etrar
SFX A r rision/M [lnoru]đar
SFX A r rision/M [mp]eritar
SFX A r rision/M [mv]ergolar
SFX A r rision/M [no]struir
SFX A r rision/M [nr]guir
SFX A r rision/M [ns]erbar
SFX A r rision/M [ns]ervar
SFX A r rision/M [ns]kuercar
SFX A r rision/M [nsv]edar
SFX A r rision/M [nx]goŧar
SFX A r rision/M [op]ar
SFX A r rision/M [ox]longar
SFX A r rision/M [pt]erveñir
SFX A r rision/M [pt]resar
SFX A r rision/M [pt]rotar
SFX A r rision/M [stŧ]imentar
SFX A r rision/M [sŧ]erkar
SFX A r rision/M [tuv]iliđar
SFX A r rision/M [tv]eriđar
SFX A r rision/M [tv]erniđar
SFX A r rision/M [tv]oler
SFX A r rision/M [xŧ]ertar
SFX A r rision/M alar
SFX A r rision/M aler
SFX A r rision/M alienar
SFX A r rision/M amar
SFX A r rision/M arar
SFX A r rision/M arveñir
SFX A r rision/M aver
SFX A r rision/M bersajar
SFX A r rision/M bertonar
SFX A r rision/M bordeđar
SFX A r rision/M dar
SFX A r rision/M deramar
SFX A r rision/M derenar
SFX A r rision/M derivar
SFX A r rision/M derobar
SFX A r rision/M derokar
SFX A r rision/M derokir
SFX A r rision/M derotar
SFX A r rision/M desavir
SFX A r rision/M desferenŧiar
SFX A r rision/M devorar
SFX A r rision/M devorŧiar
SFX A r rision/M dexeredar
SFX A r rision/M dexverxenar
SFX A r rision/M dir
SFX A r rision/M donar
SFX A r rision/M exerŧitar
SFX A r rision/M far
SFX A r rision/M fermentar
SFX A r rision/M fumar
SFX A r rision/M griliar
SFX A r rision/M guernar
SFX A r rision/M inbaretar
SFX A r rision/M infervorar
SFX A r rision/M inkartonar
SFX A r rision/M intarsiar
SFX A r rision/M interesar
SFX A r rision/M interiŧir
SFX A r rision/M interkalar
SFX A r rision/M interkuerar
SFX A r rision/M interkuirar
SFX A r rision/M interlinear
SFX A r rision/M interlokuir
SFX A r rision/M intermeđar
SFX A r rision/M interogar
SFX A r rision/M interpretar
SFX A r rision/M intiriŧir
SFX A r rision/M inveriar
SFX A r rision/M inversiar
SFX A r rision/M inŧercelar
SFX A r rision/M kalar
SFX A r rision/M kalefar
SFX A r rision/M kantar
SFX A r rision/M karpir
SFX A r rision/M kolar
SFX A r rision/M korniđar
SFX A r rision/M koñer
SFX A r rision/M kriolar
SFX A r rision/M kurvar
SFX A r rision/M lotar
SFX A r rision/M lumar
SFX A r rision/M lustrar
SFX A r rision/M maravejar
SFX A r rision/M menar
SFX A r rision/M meravejar
SFX A r rision/M merkantar
SFX A r rision/M merkantiđar
SFX A r rision/M međar
SFX A r rision/M mojar
SFX A r rision/M mudarar
SFX A r rision/M ojar
SFX A r rision/M okar
SFX A r rision/M ormeđar
SFX A r rision/M parer
SFX A r rision/M perdonar
SFX A r rision/M perfumar
SFX A r rision/M perifraxar
SFX A r rision/M periodar
SFX A r rision/M perkolar
SFX A r rision/M perkotar
SFX A r rision/M perletar
SFX A r rision/M perlustrar
SFX A r rision/M permaner
SFX A r rision/M permudarar
SFX A r rision/M permutar
SFX A r rision/M perorar
SFX A r rision/M perpetrar
SFX A r rision/M perpetuar
SFX A r rision/M perseguir
SFX A r rision/M perseguitar
SFX A r rision/M personaliđar
SFX A r rision/M persugar
SFX A r rision/M pertegar
SFX A r rision/M pervertir
SFX A r rision/M poder
SFX A r rision/M pongar
SFX A r rision/M rajar
SFX A r rision/M ramar
SFX A r rision/M raxar
SFX A r rision/M redar
SFX A r rision/M remaner
SFX A r rision/M rigolar
SFX A r rision/M rivar
SFX A r rision/M robar
SFX A r rision/M roersar
SFX A r rision/M rokir
SFX A r rision/M rolar
SFX A r rision/M sajar
SFX A r rision/M scantiđar
SFX A r rision/M seguir
SFX A r rision/M seguitar
SFX A r rision/M serajar
SFX A r rision/M servir
SFX A r rision/M siar
SFX A r rision/M skortegar
SFX A r rision/M sotolinear
SFX A r rision/M soverkiar
SFX A r rision/M spergoŧar
SFX A r rision/M sperimentar
SFX A r rision/M sperlongar
SFX A r rision/M spernacar
SFX A r rision/M speronar
SFX A r rision/M sperđurar
SFX A r rision/M steriliđar
SFX A r rision/M sugar
SFX A r rision/M superbir
SFX A r rision/M terapienar
SFX A r rision/M teraŧar
SFX A r rision/M termenar
SFX A r rision/M terminar
SFX A r rision/M terŧariolar
SFX A r rision/M teñir
SFX A r rision/M tonar
SFX A r rision/M tormentar
SFX A r rision/M tuar
SFX A r rision/M tuir
SFX A r rision/M vejar
SFX A r rision/M velar
SFX A r rision/M verdeđar
SFX A r rision/M vergiđar
SFX A r rision/M vergoñar
SFX A r rision/M verifegar
SFX A r rision/M verigolar
SFX A r rision/M verolar
SFX A r rision/M versar
SFX A r rision/M vertir
SFX A r rision/M verxurar
SFX A r rision/M verđelar
SFX A r rision/M veñir
SFX A r rision/M xberlefar
SFX A r rision/M xberlotar
SFX A r rision/M xberlumar
SFX A r rision/M xberxelar
SFX A r rision/M xeguir
SFX A r rision/M xelar
SFX A r rision/M xermojar
SFX A r rision/M xgoñar
SFX A r rision/M xlargiđar
SFX A r rision/M xmerdar
SFX A r rision/M xmerejar
SFX A r rision/M xmeriliar
SFX A r rision/M xmerŧiar
SFX A r rision/M xmorgolar
SFX A r rision/M xnervađar
SFX A r rision/M xufruir
SFX A r rision/M xvergoñaŧar
SFX A r rision/M đurar
SFX A r rision/M ŧercar
SFX A r rision/M ŧernir
SFX A r rision/M ŧerpir
SFX A r rision/M ŧirkuir
SFX A r rision/M ŧitar
SFX A r rision/M ŧokir
SFX A r risionse [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A r risionse [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A r risionse [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A r risionse [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
