public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
abokadar/A
albeđar/A
alŧar/A
andonar/A
apostrofar/A
arguir/A
aséder/A
atribuir/A
dexautorar/A
babar/A
inbagolar/A
baketar/A
inbalokar/A
balotar/A
inbanbolar/A
xbankar/A
baratar/A
inbaretar/A
inbaronar/A
strabastar/A
rebatiđar/A
dexbaukar/A
xbaveŧar/A
inbekar/A
inbendar/A
xberxelar/A
beverar/A
xbiankeđar/A
bibiatar/A
inbindelar/A
birbantar/A
bixar/A
bójer/A
rebóɉer/A
xbokolar/A
inbolponar/A
abonbar/A
xborar/A
abordar/A
xbosegar/A
inbotiliar/A
xboŧar/A
inbragar/A
bramiđar/A
dexbratar/A
bravar/A
xbrigar/A
broar/A
inbroɉar/A
bronbar/A
inbrumar/A
xbudelar/A
buratar/A
inbustar/A
buxerar/A
scanŧar/A
scaređar/A
cekolar/A
mancèñer/A
aparcéñer/A
precetar/A
cilar/A
cokiđar/A
dixdir/A
kondanar/A
prodegar/A
deñar/A
deŧimar/A
dindolar/A
indíxer/A
docar/A
domar/A
redonar/A
stradopiar/A
adosar/A
indreŧar/A
dúxer/A
sedúxer/A
inđenocar/A
inđónxer/A
đugar/A
èrđer/A
ekuivokar/A
entuxiaxmar/A
riéser/A
examenar/A
exular/A
likuefar/A
desfabrikar/A
fakinar/A
kontrafaliar/A
fanfuñar/A
desfarinar/A
fataliđar/A
infaŧolar/A
klasifegar/A
ratifegar/A
infeltronar/A
defenestrar/A
inferir/A
fermentar/A
infetar/A
infiakir/A
infiapir/A
konfidar/A
fifotar/A
strafilar/A
finir/A
fiolar/A
infirmar/A
infistegar/A
influir/A
fofar/A
sfogonar/A
infolponar/A
traforar/A
konfortar/A
informigar/A
infradelar/A
frasar/A
rafredir/A
sfritegar/A
fufiñar/A
profumegar/A
xgabanar/A
ingaluŧar/A
dexgarbelar/A
ingatejar/A
glutinar/A
xgorbar/A
ingramir/A
xgrankir/A
ingravar/A
xgretolar/A
xgriŧar/A
ingrotir/A
guarir/A
ingurar/A
ilunar/A
ingorgar/A
insosolar/A
invenŧionar/A
jutar/A
inɉermar/A
dexɉustar/A
rinkagar/A
kalkar/A
skalŧar/A
kanbiar/A
skanpar/A
kañar/A
inkaponar/A
skarkajar/A
skarpir/A
skasar/A
skataronar/A
deskaŧar/A
inkavalkar/A
esklúder/A
inkokar/A
kolorar/A
eskomiar/A
konfesar/A
skonpañar/A
kontentar/A
koñer/A
skórer/A
inkorđar/A
kortiđar/A
kovar/A
krekolar/A
kroar/A
krostolinar/A
kuaɉar/A
kuerelar/A
skular/A
skurtar/A
lagremar/A
xlapar/A
dexlaŧar/A
ledrar/A
aletar/A
liberar/A
limitar/A
xlofar/A
lordar/A
inluminar/A
macar/A
xmakar/A
remandar/A
manteđar/A
remarkar/A
marŧir/A
xmaskerar/A
xmaŧar/A
intermeđar/A
mendar/A
meretar/A
kométer/A
mietar/A
amirar/A
xmokar/A
amonir/A
premorir/A
remorkiar/A
motivar/A
mudarar/A
dexmurar/A
amutinar/A
malnàser/A
negriđar/A
noar/A
denotar/A
ñaolar/A
odorar/A
oliar/A
ónđer/A
straordenar/A
ortrigar/A
inpacar/A
pagontar/A
spalar/A
palpiñar/A
inpanocar/A
deskonparir/A
pariđar/A
partorir/A
pasiđar/A
inpatar/A
inspaŧientar/A
arpegar/A
inpeliŧar/A
spénder/A
inpensar/A
perdonar/A
personaliđar/A
inpetacar/A
petufar/A
sopiantar/A
despiegar/A
inpinir/A
piovexinar/A
pistoletar/A
platinar/A
inpolmonar/A
apóner/A
supóner/A
spontar/A
trapónxer/A
trasportar/A
ipotegar/A
strapregar/A
apreŧiar/A
sprofondar/A
despuleđar/A
inputar/A
ràder/A
skoraɉar/A
ranpegar/A
ratinar/A
dexredar/A
arénder/A
rexistrar/A
dexriŧolar/A
roegar/A
inrokir/A
roñar/A
roversar/A
rugolar/A
dexruviɉar/A
insakar/A
salasar/A
saltelar/A
desapunir/A
scafeđar/A
scopiđar/A
sekuestrar/A
prosèguer/A
deseɉar/A
insenbrar/A
aseñar/A
servir/A
sfaltar/A
sidiar/A
sincerar/A
sitonar/A
skapinar/A
skarsiđar/A
skerŧar/A
skoređar/A
deskríver/A
skuriar/A
soleɉar/A
resomeɉar/A
sorbetar/A
spalmar/A
spear/A
inspesar/A
spifarar/A
traspirar/A
sporkacar/A
malstar/A
starnudar/A
konstatar/A
sterŧar/A
institikir/A
instokar/A
stranir/A
striar/A
kostruir/A
stubiar/A
sturar/A
sugar/A
suplantar/A
tabakar/A
tajuŧar/A
tamusar/A
intantar/A
tarifar/A
intavanar/A
tediar/A
proténder/A
tenporiđar/A
reténxer/A
sosteñir/A
téñer/A
aterar/A
tèser/A
tibiar/A
tiraniđar/A
retoler/A
tonfolar/A
tormentar/A
stòrđer/A
atràer/A
tradir/A
strapar/A
retratar/A
tremar/A
tribolar/A
tripudiar/A
trotolar/A
intuɉar/A
inŧankar/A
reŧeđar/A
inŧeñar/A
deŧervelar/A
ŧigar/A
ŧiñar/A
inŧokir/A
ŧupegar/A
urteđar/A
evakuar/A
valutar/A
xvaporar/A
vedar/A
sorvejar/A
xvenar/A
xventrar/A
resoveñir/A
intravèñer/A
vergar/A
xvernar/A
konvèrter/A
xvetolar/A
vilir/A
viñar/A
konvíver/A
xvogaŧar/A
involđar/A
dexvòlxer/A
inxalontrar/A
xbarlar/A
xdrumenar/A
inxeregar/A
xɉaventar/A
xmorgolar/A
exultar/A
